Utah statutes.
10-3-1005.   Organization of commission -- Secretary -- Offices.

The civil service commission shall organize by selecting one of its members chairman, and shall appoint as secretary one of the available officers or employees of the city, who shall act and serve without additional compensation. The secretary shall keep a record of all meetings of the civil service commission and of its work and shall perform such other services as the commission may require, and shall have the custody of the books and records of the commission. The board of city commissioners shall provide suitable accommodations and equipment to enable the civil service commission to attend to its business.



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

